Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.280

Ambulance service—Transport of patients to a nonmedical facility.

An ambulance service may transport patients to a nonmedical facility, such as a mental health facility or chemical dependency program as authorized in regional emergency medical services and trauma care plans under RCW 70.168.100.

[ 2015 c 157 s 4.]